src/twol-fin.txt
Alphabet

 %^A:ä %^O:ö %^U:y ! The archiphonemes
 %>:0  %^V  %^¤:0 '

 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q
 r s t u v w x y z å ä ö ø æ 
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ª ß ç
 i2:i i3:i i4:i i5:i
 
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q
 R S T U V W X Y Z Å Ä Ö Ø Æ
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð

 p1:p t1:t k1:k

 X1:0 X2:0 X3:0 X4:0 X5:0 X6:0 X7:0 X8:0 X9:0   ! diacritics
 Y1:0 Y2:0 Y3:0 Y4:0 Y5:0 Y6:0 Y7:0 Y8:0 Y9:0 
 Z1:0 Z2:0 Z3:0 Z4:0 Z5:0 Z6:0 Z7:0 Z8:0 Z9:0 
 %^TES:0 ;


Sets
 Vow = a e i o u y ä ö å %^A %^O %^U %^V i2 i3 i4 i5 ;
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ' p1 t1 k1 %^¤;
 Front = ä ö y ;
 Back = a o u ;
 Neutral = i e i2 i3 i4 i5 ;
 ArchiVow = %^A %^O %^U %^V ;
 FrontNeutral = i e ä ö y i2 i3 i4 i5 ;
 Dummy = %> !%#%# 
 X1 X2 X3 X4 X5 X6 X7 X8 X9
 Y1 Y2 Y3 Y4 Y5 Y6 Y7 Y8 Y9 
 Z1 Z2 Z3 Z4 Z5 Z6 Z7 Z8 Z9 %^TES ; 
 NonFront = Cns  Back Neutral Dummy ArchiVow ;
 NonBack =  Cns Front Neutral Dummy ArchiVow ;
 WeG = X1 X2 X4 Y1 ;
 HighLabial = u y ;
 Liquid = l r ;
 VclessStop = k p t k1 p1 t1 ;
 Labial = p b m ;
 Velar = g k ;
 Nasal = m n ;


Rules

! Vowel rules
! -----------

"Back harmony"
  [  %^A:a | %^O:o | %^U:u ] <=> Back: NonFront:*
				%>: NonFront:* _ ;
!				%>: NonBack:* _ ;

"Vowel copying"
 %^V:Vx <=> :Vx Dummy:* %>:0 _ ;
	where Vx in ( a e i o u y ä ö ) ;

"Vowel copying in h-illative"
 %^V:Vx <=> Vx: %>:0 [ h | s ] _ ;
	where Vx in ( a e i o u y ä ö ) ; 

"Vowel copying in s-illative"
 %^V:Vx <=> Vx: %>:0 s %^V: _ ;
	where Vx in ( a e i o u y ä ö ) ; 

"e:i in nom.sg. of e-stems" ! ove : ovi
 e:i <=> _ Z1: #: ;

"e:0 in plural of e-stems" ! ovien
 e:0 <=> _  (Dummy:)  %>:0 [ i2:i | i2:j ] ;
! Y1 removed

"e:0 in consonant stems"
 e:0 <=> Cns: _ [ Y5: | Y7: ] %>:0 t ;

"i:0 in par and gen pl of i-stems" ! ristien
 i:0 <=> Cns: _ Z2: %>:0 i2:i %>:0 [ e n | %^A: ] ;

"i:e in i-stems"
 i:e <=> Cns: _ ( X4:) %>:0 [ i2:i | i2:j ] %>:0 ;

"i as j intervocalically in affixes"
 i2:j <=> [ Vow - :i ] (Dummy: | %^¤: ) %>:0 _ %>:0 Vow:Vow ; 
! valoien : valojen

"a to 0 in front of i"
 a:0 <=> _ [ X2: | Y2: ] %>:0 i2: ;
!a:0 <=> [ u | o ] (Neutral) Cns: Cns:* _  (Dummy:) [ X2: | Y2: ] %>: i2: ;
 ! koiraien : koirien

"a to o in front of i"
 a:o <=> _ [ X4: | Y1: | Y3: ] %>:0 i2: ;
!a:o <=> a Cns: Cns:*  _  (Dummy:) Y3: %>: i: ;
 ! kalaien : kalojen

! Long vowel and diphtong shortening
! ----------------------------------

"Shortening of ie, yö, uo and long vowels"
 Vx:0 <=> _ Vy: (Dummy:) %>:0 [ i2: | i3 | i4: | i5 ] ;
      where Vx in ( i y u a e i o u y ä ö )
	    Vy in ( e ö o a e i o u y ä ö )
	    matched ;

! Consonant gradation
! -------------------

"Qualitative consonant gradation"
 Cx:Cy <=>  h | Liquid | Vow: _ Vow: WeG: ;
       where Cx in (k p t)
             Cy in (0 v d)
             matched ;

"Quantitative consonant gradation"
 Cx:0 <=>  Cx _ Vow: WeG: ;
      where Cx in VclessStop ;

"Assimilative"
 Cx:Cy <=> Cz _ Vow: ( Vow ) WeG: ;
      where Cx in ( k p t )
	    Cy in ( g m n )
	    Cz in ( n m n )
	    matched ;

"Gradation of k after long vowel"
 k:' <=> Vow Vx: _ Vx: WeG: ;
     where Vx in Vow ;

"Gradation of k between u/y"
 k:v <=> Cns: Vx _ Vx WeG: ;
	 where Vx in HighLabial ;

"Gradation of k after h or liquid"
 k:j <=> Liquid | h _ e: WeG: ;

"Gradation of t after liquids"
 t:Cx <=> Cx _ Vow: WeG: ;
      where Cx in Liquid ;

"Weak grade of poika, aika"
! i:j <=> #: [ p o | a ] _ k: a: WeG: ;
 i:j <=> .#. [ p o | a ] _ k: a: WeG: ;

"Weak grade of ruoka"
! o:u => #: r u _ k: a: WeG: ; 
 o:u => .#. r u _ k: a: WeG: ; 


! Consonant alternations
! ----------------------

"Alternation finally in consonant stems"
 m:n <=> Vow: _ i: Y5: %>:0 t ;
 ! toimi : tointen

!"s:d in susi - suden etc."
! s:d <=> Vow: _ i: X2: %>:0 ;

!"s:t in susi - sutena etc."
! s:t <=> [ n | Vow: ] _ i: [ Y5: | Y6: | Y7: ] %>:0 ;
! Y7 can be replaced by Y5, I guess...

!"s:n in kynsi - kynnet"
! s:n <=> n _ i: X2: ;

"p:0 and t:0 in consonant stems" ! lasten
 Cx:0 <=> Vow: _ s e: Y5: %>:0 t ;
      where Cx in ( p t ) ;

"m:n in nonfinal positions"
 m:n <=> Vow:Vow _ e: Dummy:* #: ;

"t:s in front of different i-s"
 t:s <=> _ e:i Z1: ;
     <=> _ e: %^TES:0 ;

"e:0 in 4-syll vowel stems"
 e:0 <=> _ %^TES:0 ;

!€ kalleute%^TES
!€ kalleus00

! Miscellanious rules
! -------------------

"Apostroph deletion for parfait"
 ':0 <=> Cns: _ Y4: ;
